Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-3411
Authority of attorney in fact; commencement.

The authority of the attorney in fact shall commence upon a determination pursuant to section 30-3412 that the principal is incapable of making health care decisions.

Laws 1992, LB 696, § 11.